Utah statutes.
78B-6-1113.   Evidence of nuisance.
In any action for abatement by eviction instituted pursuant to Sections
78B-6-1107 through 78B-6-1114, all evidence otherwise authorized by law,
including evidence of reputation in a community, is admissible to prove the
existence of a nuisance by a preponderance of the evidence.
